Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 74
IDAHO SOLID WASTE FACILITIES ACT

Sec.

§ 39-7401. Legislative findings and purposes.

The legislature finds:

That adverse public health and environmental impacts can result from the improper land disposal of solid waste and that the need for establishing safe sites with adequate capacity for the disposal of solid waste is a matter of statewide concern and necessity; and

That the resource conservation and recovery act (42 U.S.C. sec. 6901, et seq.) as amended, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, establish complex, detailed and costly provisions for the location, design, operation and monitoring of solid waste disposal sites, including such sites as may be operated pursuant to the responsibility established in chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code; and

That a state program to implement flexible standards provided in 40 CFR 258, if approved by the U.S. environmental protection agency, enables a state to take advantage of site specific factors in the design and operation of solid waste facilities and flexibility in meeting federal criteria set forth in that regulation; and

That 40 CFR 258 provides that such a program of flexible standards requires approvals by a designated state agency; and

That chapter 1, title 39, Idaho Code, vests the department of environmental quality with the responsibility to issue a certificate of suitability concerning prospective solid waste landfill sites, to approve solid waste facility and ground water monitoring programs and to provide approvals pursuant to 40 CFR 258; and

That chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code, imposes on the counties the primary responsibility for the development and operation of a solid waste management system; and

That chapter 4, title 39, Idaho Code, vests the health districts with the primary responsibility for the review of solid waste facility operations plans and the enforcement of solid waste management operations; and

That the coordination and timeliness of response to federal law on the part of all public officials within the state is critical to compliance with federal regulations, the ability of each affected agency to carry out their statutory responsibilities and the avoidance of excessive construction and public expenditures.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a program of solid waste management which complies with 40 CFR 258 and facilitates the incorporation of flexible standards in facility design and operation. The legislature hereby establishes the solid waste disposal standards and procedures outlined herein and a facility approval process for the state of Idaho, the political subdivisions thereof, and any private solid waste disposal site owner in order to facilitate the development and operation of solid waste disposal sites, to effect timely and responsible completion of statutory duties and to ensure protection of human health and the environment, to protect the air, land and waters of the state of Idaho.

§ 39-7402. Applicability.

The standards and procedures set forth in this chapter apply to owners and operators of new municipal solid waste landfill (MSWLF) units, existing MSWLF units, and lateral expansions of existing MSWLF units, except as otherwise specifically provided.

The requirements of this chapter do not apply to MSWLF units that ceased to accept waste on or prior to October 9, 1991.

MSWLF units that receive waste after October 9, 1991, but stop receiving waste in conformance with the provisions of 40 CFR 258.1(d), are exempt from the requirements of this chapter, except as expressly provided herein.

All MSWLF units that receive waste on or after October 9, 1993, must comply with all of the requirements of this chapter, unless otherwise allowed in 40 CFR 258.1(d), (e) or (f).

MSWLF units failing to satisfy these standards shall cease operation and shall not accept municipal solid waste for disposal by order of the department of environmental quality and/or the district health department until provisions of this chapter are complied with unless a compliance schedule has been approved by the director of the department of environmental quality and/or the district health department.

MSWLF units failing to satisfy the requirements set forth in this chapter are considered open dumps for purposes of state solid waste management planning and are prohibited under section 4005 of RCRA.

MSWLF units containing sewage sludge and which fail to satisfy the criteria set forth in 40 CFR 258 violate sections 309 and 405(e) of the clean water act.

§ 39-7402A. Excluded facilities.

This chapter shall not apply to any facility subject to the provisions of subtitle C of RCRA, the hazardous waste management act of 1983, as amended (section 39-4401, et seq., Idaho Code) or the state hazardous waste facility siting act, as amended (section 39-5801, et seq., Idaho Code).

§ 39-7403. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Active portion” means that part of a facility or unit that has received or is receiving wastes and that has not been closed in accordance with 40 CFR 258.60.

“Agricultural wastes” means wastes generated on farms resulting from the production of agricultural products including, but not limited to, manures and carcasses of dead animals weighing each or collectively in excess of fifteen (15) pounds but do not include wastes that are classified as hazardous.

“Applicant” means the owner or the operator with the owner’s written consent.

“Aquifer” means a geological formation, group of formations, or a portion of a formation capable of yielding significant quantities of ground water to wells or springs.

“Board” means the Idaho board of environmental quality.

“Buffer zone” means that part of a facility that lies between the active portion and the property boundary.

“Clean soils and clean dredge spoils” means soils and dredge spoils which are not hazardous wastes or problem wastes as defined in this section.

“Commercial solid waste” means all types of solid waste generated by stores, offices, restaurants, warehouses and other nonmanufacturing activities, excluding residential and industrial wastes.

“Commercial solid waste facility” means a facility owned and operated as an enterprise conducted with the intent of making a profit by any individual, association, firm, or partnership for the disposal of solid waste, but excludes a facility owned or operated by a political subdivision, state or federal agency, municipality or a facility owned or operated by any individual, association, firm or partnership exclusively for the disposal of solid waste generated by such individual, association, firm or partnership.

“Construction/demolition waste” means the waste building materials, packaging and rubble resulting from construction, remodeling, repair and demolition operations on pavements, houses, commercial buildings and other structures. Such waste includes, but is not limited to, bricks, concrete, other masonry materials, soil, rock, lumber, road spoils, rebar, paving materials and tree stumps. Noninert wastes and asbestos wastes are not considered to be demolition waste for the purposes of this chapter.

“Contaminate” means to allow discharge of a substance from a landfill that would cause:

The concentration of that substance in the ground water to exceed the maximum contamination level (MCL) specified in 40 CFR 258.40, Idaho drinking water standards; or

A statistically significant increase in the concentration of that substance in the ground water where the existing concentration of that substance exceeds the maximum contamination level specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection; or

A statistically significant increase above background in the concentration of a substance which:

is not specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and

is a result of the disposal of solid waste; and

has been determined by the department to present a substantial risk to human health or the environment in the concentrations found at the point of compliance.
(12) “County” means any county in the state of Idaho.

within one thousand (1,000) feet of any perennial lake or pond.

“County” means any county in the state of Idaho.

“Cover material” means soil or other suitable material that is used to protect the active portion of the MSWLF unit.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of environmental quality.

“Existing MSWLF unit” means any municipal solid waste landfill unit that is receiving solid waste as of the applicable date specified in 40 CFR 258.1(e).

“Facility” means all contiguous land and structures, buffer zones, and other appurtenances and improvements on the land used for the disposal of solid waste.

“Floodplain” means the area encompassed by the one hundred (100) year flood as defined by applicable federal emergency management agency (FEMA) flood insurance maps or, if no map exists, then as defined in 40 CFR 258.11.

“Ground water” means water below the land surface in a zone of saturation.

“Health district” means one (1) of the seven (7) district health departments of the state of Idaho.

“Holocene fault” means a fault characterized as a fracture or a zone of fractures in any material along which strata on one (1) side have been displaced with respect to that on the other side and holocene being the most recent epoch of the quaternary period, extending from the end of the pleistocene epoch to the present.

“Household waste” means any solid waste, including garbage, trash and sanitary waste in septic tanks, derived from households, including single and multiple residences, hotels and motels, bunkhouses, ranger stations, crew quarters, campgrounds, picnic grounds and day use recreation areas.

“Industrial solid waste” means solid waste generated by manufacturing or industrial processes that is not a hazardous waste regulated under subtitle C of RCRA. Such waste may include, but is not limited to, waste resulting from the following manufacturing processes: electric power generation; fertilizer and agricultural chemicals; food and related products and byproducts; inorganic chemicals; iron and steel manufacturing; leather and leather products; nonferrous metals manufacturing/foundries; organic chemicals; plastics and resins manufacturing; pulp and paper industry; rubber and miscellaneous plastic products; stone, glass, clay and concrete products; textile manufacturing; transportation equipment; and water treatment. This term does not include mining waste or oil and gas waste.

“Inert wastes” means noncombustible, nonhazardous, nonputrescible, nonleaching solid wastes that are likely to retain their physical and chemical structure under expected conditions of disposal, including resistance to biological attack.

“Landfill” means an area of land or an excavation in which wastes are placed for permanent disposal, and that is not a land application unit, surface impoundment, injection well or waste pile.

“Landspreading disposal facility” or “land application unit” means a facility that applies sludges or other solid wastes onto or incorporates solid waste into the soil surface, excluding manure spreading operations, at greater than agronomic rates and soil conditioners and immobilization rates.

“Lateral expansion” means a horizontal expansion of the waste boundaries of an existing MSWLF unit.

“Leachate” means a liquid that has passed through or emerged from solid waste and contains soluble, suspended or miscible materials removed from such waste.

“Limited purpose landfill” means a landfill that receives solid waste of limited type with known and consistent composition other than wood wastes, municipal solid waste, inert waste and construction/demolition waste.
(29) “Liquid waste” as defined in 40 CFR 258.28(c)(1).

Overburden, waste dumps and low-grade stockpiles from mining operations;

Liquid wastes whose discharge or potential discharge is regulated under federal, state or local water pollution permits;

Hazardous wastes as designated in the hazardous waste management act, chapter 44, title 39, Idaho Code;

Wood waste used for ornamental, animal bedding, mulch and plant bedding and road building purposes;

Agricultural wastes, limited to manures and crop residues, returned to the soils at agronomic rates;

Clean soils and clean dredge spoils as otherwise regulated under section 404 of the federal clean water act (PL 95-217);

Septage taken to a sewage treatment plant permitted by either the U.S. environmental protection agency or the department; and

Wood debris resulting from the harvesting of timber and the disposal of which is permitted under chapter 1, title 38, Idaho Code.

(30) “Monofill” means a landfill which contains a specific waste whose waste stream characteristics remain unchanged over time and may include special wastes, problem wastes or other consistent characteristic wastes but do not include wastes regulated under any other applicable regulations.

(31) “Municipal solid waste landfill unit (MSWLF)” means a discrete area of land or an excavation that receives household waste, and that is not a land application unit, surface impoundment, injection well, or waste pile, as those terms are defined under 40 CFR 257.2. A MSWLF unit also may receive other types of RCRA subtitle D wastes, such as commercial solid waste, nonhazardous sludge, conditionally exempt small quantity generator waste and industrial solid waste. Such a landfill may be publicly or privately owned. A MSWLF unit may be a new MSWLF unit, an existing MSWLF unit or a lateral expansion.

(32) “New MSWLF unit” means any municipal solid waste landfill unit that has not received waste prior to October 9, 1993, or prior to October 9, 1995, if the MSWLF unit meets the conditions specified in 40 CFR 258.1(f)(1).

(33) “Open burning” means the combustion of solid waste without: (a) control of combustion air to maintain adequate temperature for efficient combustion; (b) containment of the combustion reaction in an enclosed device to provide sufficient resident time and mixing for complete combustion; and (c) control of the emission of the combustion products.

(34) “Operator” means the person(s) responsible for the overall operation of a facility or part of a facility.

(35) “Owner” means the person(s) who owns a facility or part of a facility.

(36) “Permeability” means the capacity of a material to transmit a liquid. For the purposes of this chapter permeability is expressed in terms of hydraulic conductivity of water in centimeters-per-second units of measurement.

(37) “Person” means an individual, association, firm, partnership, political subdivision, public or private corporation, state or federal agency, municipality, industry, or any other legal entity whatsoever.

(38) “Pile” or “waste pile” means any noncontainerized solid, nonflowing waste that is accumulated for treatment or storage.

(39) “Plan of operation” means the written plan developed by an owner or operator of a MSWLF unit detailing how the facility is to be operated during its active life, during closure, and throughout the post closure period.

(40) “Point of compliance” means a vertical surface located at the hydraulically downgradient intercept with the uppermost aquifer at which a release from a waste management unit measured as change in constituent values will trigger assessment monitoring. Point of compliance shall be used to define the facility design, location and frequency of ground water monitoring wells and corrective action.

(41) “Post closure” means the requirements placed upon the MSWLF unit after closure to ensure their environmental safety for a thirty (30) year period or until the site becomes stabilized in accordance with section 39-7416, Idaho Code.

(42) “Processing” means an operation conducted on solid waste to prepare it for disposal.

(43) “Qualified professional” means a licensed professional geologist or licensed professional engineer, as appropriate, holding current professional registration in compliance with applicable provisions of the Idaho Code.
(44) “RCRA” means the resource conservation and recovery act (42 U.S.C. sec. 6901 et seq.), as amended.

(45) “Run-off” means any rainwater, leachate, or other liquid that drains over land from any part of a facility.

(46) “Run-on” means any rainwater, leachate, or other liquid that drains over land onto any part of a facility.

(47) “Saturated zone” means that part of the earth’s crust in which all voids are filled with water.

(48) “Septage” means a semisolid consisting of settled sewage solids combined with varying amounts of water and dissolved materials generated from a septic tank system.

(49) “Sludge” means any solid, semisolid, or liquid waste generated from a municipal, commercial, or industrial waste water treatment plant, water supply treatment plant or air pollution control facility exclusive of the treated effluent from a waste water treatment plant.

(50) “Solid waste” means any garbage or refuse, sludge from a waste water treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility and other discarded material including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations and from community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage, or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that are point sources subject to permit under 33 U.S.C. 1342, or source, special nuclear, or byproduct material as defined in the atomic energy act of 1954, as amended (68 Stat. 923). These regulations shall not apply to the following solid wastes:

(51) “Special waste” means those wastes which require special treatment or handling after it arrives at the disposal site. The term includes, but is not limited to, asbestos containing material, petroleum contaminated soils, low-level PCB containing material, low-level dioxin containing material and uncut tires.

(52) “Statistically significant” means significant as determined by ANOVA analysis of variance as applied within 40 CFR 258.53(h)(2) or as provided by 40 CFR 258.53(g)(5).

(53) “Uppermost aquifer” means the geological formation nearest the natural ground surface that is an aquifer as well as lower aquifers that are hydraulically interconnected with this aquifer within the facility’s property boundary.
(54) “Waste management unit boundary” means a vertical surface located at the hydraulically downgradient limit of the unit. This vertical surface extends down into the uppermost aquifer.

(55) “Water quality standard” means a standard set for maximum allowable contamination in surface waters and ground water as set forth in the water quality standards for waters for the state of Idaho.

(56) “Wetlands” as defined in 40 CFR 232.2(r).

(57) “Wood waste” means solid waste consisting of wood pieces or particles generated as a byproduct or waste from the manufacturing of wood products, handling and storage of raw materials and trees and stumps. This includes, but is not limited to, sawdust, chips, shavings, bark, pulp, hog fuel and log yard waste, but does not include wood pieces or particles containing chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenate.

Undefined terms shall be given their usual and ordinary meaning within the context of the provisions of this chapter.

§ 39-7404. Consistency with federal law — Status of appendices.

The legislature intends that the state of Idaho enact and carry out a solid waste program that will enable the state to achieve approved state status with respect to solid waste disposal facility regulation from the federal government.

The legislature finds that subtitle D of RCRA, and in particular the code of federal regulations, title 40, part 257 and 258, establish complex, detailed and costly provisions for the disposal of solid waste. By the provisions of this chapter, the legislature desires to avoid duplicative or conflicting state and federal regulatory systems and allow local MSWLF unit owners the maximum flexibility possible under 40 CFR 257 and 258, to meet the substantive goals of protection of human health and the environment with consideration for actual site and climatic conditions. At any time that 40 CFR 257 or 40 CFR 258 is amended, any additional flexibility or extension otherwise prohibited by this chapter shall be allowed as applicable.

The board may not promulgate any rule pursuant to this act that would impose conditions or requirements more stringent or broader in scope than the referenced RCRA regulations of the United States environmental protection agency or the provisions of this chapter. Until regulations are adopted, agency conclusions in appendix B through appendix H, inclusive, per the “Federal Register” of October 9, 1991, shall be used for technical guidance for relevant provisions of this chapter.

§ 39-7405. Authority regarding solid waste.

The local government entity with legal responsibility for disposal of solid waste pursuant to the provisions of chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code, shall have full authority to manage and control the ownership, disposition and ultimate disposal of solid waste within its jurisdiction. It is the intention of the legislature that this grant of authority shall be construed in manner commensurate with the full extent of the duties established in chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code.

§ 39-7406. Respective roles of county, director and health district — Liberal construction.

The county, director and health district each perform key roles in statewide solid waste management. Principal jurisdiction for the various functions of solid waste regulation and management as it pertains to site selection, development, operation, and closure shall be carried out as outlined herein:

Each county may select a solid waste landfill site or sites, evaluate said site(s) for compliance with site certification criteria, develop design plans for construction and operation of MSWLF unit(s), including ground water monitoring programs, provide for public review of its site certification, facility design and operation plans through the conduct of a twenty-eight (28) day public comment period, publish legal notices, serve as the repository of funds established for financial assurance, cooperate with the director and district to construct and operate a solid waste disposal system which protects human health and the environment, and perform such other solid waste related duties as may be specified in chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code;

The director shall interact and cooperate with federal agencies to secure approved state status concerning solid waste programs, administer the site selection process by requiring an owner to certify, through such professional documentation as may be required in this chapter, that the site is not encumbered by critical site limitations as set forth in section 39-7407, Idaho Code, ascertaining that such certification has been made by a qualified professional, review and approve MSWLF unit design plans, the ground water monitoring program, alternative daily cover and final cover, alternative closure and post-closure care requirements recommended to the director for approval by the district, financial assurance and any other approvals required in 40 CFR 258, prepare and/or adopt such regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter, and cooperate in actual site monitoring and corrective action programs; and

The health district shall ascertain that operations standards are met, prepare and/or adopt technical guidance, review and recommend approval of alternative operating, closure and post-closure requirements to the director, and review and enforce all aspects of operation, closure and post closure except as specified above.

All approvals required by 40 CFR 258 shall be obtained by the owner and/or applicant; and all provisions of 40 CFR 258 which provide for flexibility may be obtained by the owner and/or applicant; and the director shall have the authority to grant all such approvals in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the duty to make a determination that an application meets standards or provides an acceptable alternative, and the duty to approve or disapprove the application in a timely manner prescribed in this chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to allow these public entities having jurisdiction to perform their respective roles to protect human health and the environment through expeditious and technically proper solid waste management practices, while recognizing the authority of local governments to act in their governmental capacity to perform the duties prescribed in chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code.

§ 39-7407. Location restrictions — Site certification.

The following location restrictions shall apply to all new MSWLF units, existing MSWLF units, and lateral expansions. Existing sites that cannot demonstrate compliance with the following standards for airports, floodplains, or unstable areas, must close by October 9, 1996, except as otherwise provided in 40 CFR 258.16.

All MSWLF units to which this chapter is applicable shall meet the following locational standards:

Shall not be located proximate to an airport runway except as provided in 40 CFR 258.10;

Shall not be located in areas designated by the United States fish and wildlife service or the Idaho department of fish and game as critical habitat for endangered or threatened species of plants, fish, or wildlife, or designated as critical migratory routes for protectively managed species;

Shall not be located so that the active portion is closer than two hundred (200) feet to the property line of adjacent land;

Shall not be located so as to be at variance with any locally adopted land use plan or zoning requirement unless otherwise provided by local law or ordinance, provided that if no land use plan has been adopted by the local government which would have land use jurisdiction pursuant to chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code, the site certification shall contain an analysis of the factors outlined in section 67-6508, Idaho Code, accompanied by findings and conclusions, setting forth the reasons therefore, entered by the local government with jurisdiction after a public hearing in accord with provisions of section 67-6509, Idaho Code, that the public interest would be served by locating a solid waste landfill on the site for which certification is sought;

Shall not be located so that the active portion is any closer than one thousand (1,000) feet to any state or national park, or land reserved or withdrawn for scenic or natural use;

Shall not be located within a one hundred (100) year flood plain except as provided in 40 CFR 258.11;

Shall not be located in wetlands, except as provided in 40 CFR 258.12;

A MSWLF unit active portion shall not be located:

within three hundred (300) feet or the distance of the point of compliance, whichever is greater, upstream of a perennial stream, or river; and

A MSWLF unit active portion shall not be located where the integrity of the site would be compromised by the presence of ground water which would interfere with construction or operation of the site;

A MSWLF unit shall not be located:

within two hundred (200) feet of a holocene fault as defined in 40 CFR 258.13 or adjacent to geologic features which could compromise the structural integrity of the MSWLF unit; and

within seismic impact zones except as provided in 40 CFR 258.14; and

§ 39-7408. Site certification procedure.

It shall be the responsibility of each applicant to obtain site certification from the director. The site certification process is hereby established to ascertain compliance with the requirements of section 39-7407, Idaho Code.

The site certification procedure shall be administered in the following manner:

Prior to submittal of the application, the applicant may conduct a site tour for the director, health district and all other public agencies with jurisdiction to familiarize the agencies with characteristics of the site and site surroundings.

The applicant may then submit an application to the director. The application shall address each of the criteria set forth in section 39-7407, Idaho Code, explaining the technical findings regarding each.

Wherever technical evaluation of relevant information is required, a qualified professional, as appropriate, shall certify compliance with the requisite criteria.

When the application is submitted to the director, the applicant shall publish legal notice of submittal of the application in the newspaper published in the county as determined by the criteria in section 31-819, Idaho Code, and shall make the application available for public inspection and copying. The date of publication of such notice shall begin a twenty-eight (28) day comment period during which written comments concerning the application may be submitted to the director.

The director shall act upon the application within twenty-one (21) days of the end of the comment period set forth above and shall enter a decision either certifying the site or rejecting the application. The director shall review the site certification application, not contravening the opinion of the applicant’s qualified professional(s) without reliable empirical evidence that the affirmations in the application are erroneous. Upon finding that the criteria of section 39-7407, Idaho Code, have been affirmed by qualified professionals, the director shall certify the site. Any rejection of a site certification application shall be accompanied by findings in writing expressly stating the criteria insufficiently documented and/or violated and the evidence relied upon in making such determination. Failure of the director to act within twenty-one (21) days shall constitute site certification. An applicant shall be provided an opportunity to appeal any denial of certification.

Site certification is transferable with ownership of the site.

Within ten (10) working days of receipt of certification from the director, the applicant shall publish notice in the newspaper provided for in subsection (d) of this section, informing the public that certification of the site has been approved.

§ 39-7408A. Site certification procedure for commercial solid waste facilities.

In addition to obtaining site certification as provided in section 39-7408, Idaho Code, no owner or operator of a commercial solid waste facility shall construct, expand or enlarge such a facility without a siting license from the director. Commercial solid waste facilities constructed and in operation on the effective date of this section are not required to obtain a siting license except to expand or enlarge such facilities.

§ 39-7408B. Site review panels — Members, chairman, quorum, meetings, staff.

A site review panel shall be established to insure public input in the licensing process, to recommend to the director conditions which should be included in a siting license and to recommend to the director whether a particular facility should or should not be constructed, expanded or enlarged.

A panel shall consist of eight (8) members to be appointed as follows:

Three (3) members shall be the director of the department of environmental quality or his designee, the director of the Idaho transportation department or his designee and the director of the department of water resources or his designee.

One (1) member shall be a public member appointed by the governor. The public member shall be an environmental professional, shall serve as chairman of the panel and shall be a voting member. A member who is a public member shall be appointed to serve on site review panels only until the particular siting license application subject to their review is approved, or until the application is rejected and is no longer subject to their review.

Two (2) members shall be appointed by the city council of the city located closest to or in which the commercial solid waste facility is proposed to be located, at least one (1) of whom shall be a resident of the city. The members serving pursuant to this subsection shall serve until the particular siting license application subject to their review is approved, or until the application is rejected and is no longer subject to their review.

Two (2) members shall be appointed by the county commission and be residents of the county where the commercial solid waste facility is proposed to be located. The members serving pursuant to this subsection shall serve until the particular siting license application subject to their review is approved, or until the application is rejected and is no longer subject to their review.

A person nominated to represent a city or county shall not have a conflict of interest, as that term is defined in section 74-403, Idaho Code, or derive any economic gain as that term is defined in section 74-403, Idaho Code, from the location or siting of the proposed commercial solid waste facility.

The director shall notify the city council of the nearest city and the board of county commissioners of a siting license application filed with the department, and shall instruct the city and county to appoint the necessary members to a panel.

Five (5) of the eight (8) members of the panel shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the panel and the concurrence of five (5) members of the panel shall constitute a legal action of the panel, provided that no meeting of the panel shall occur unless there are at least as many members present representing the city and county as there are representing the state and the public as appointed pursuant to subsections (2)(a) and (b) of this section. All meetings of the panel shall be conducted pursuant to the state open meeting law.

The director shall make staff available to assist a panel in carrying out its responsibilities.

Members of the panel who are not state employees shall be entitled to receive compensation as provided in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code.

§ 39-7408C. Siting license application — Fee — Rules.

An application for a siting license shall include:

The name and residence of the applicant;

The location of the proposed commercial solid waste facility;

Engineering, hydrogeologic and air quality information to indicate compliance with technical criteria as may be provided by law;

A description of the types of wastes proposed to be handled at the facility;

Information showing that harm to scenic, public health, historic, cultural or recreational values is not substantial or can be mitigated;

Information showing that the risk and impact of accident during transportation of solid waste is not substantial or can be mitigated;

Information showing that the impact on local government is not adverse regarding health, safety, cost and consistency with local planning and existing development or can be mitigated;

Financial information to indicate the applicant’s financial capability to construct, operate and close a commercial solid waste facility.

Within thirty (30) days after receipt of the application, the director shall determine whether it is complete. If it is not complete, the director shall notify the applicant and state the areas of deficiency.

The application shall be accompanied by a siting license fee. The director shall establish by rule the scale for determining the siting license application fee. The fee shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) and shall be based on the cost to the department of reviewing the siting license application. The scale shall be based on characteristics including the site size, projected waste volume, and hydrogeological and atmospheric characteristics surrounding the site. Fees received pursuant to this section may be expended by the director to pay the actual, reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the department in acting upon a siting license application.

The director shall promulgate rules in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, to implement the provisions of this section.